test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-vari42_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vari: # Noun (42) vari 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    vari+N+Sg+Nom: vari
    vari+N+Sg+Gen: vaŕo
    vari+N+Sg+Par: varjo
    vari+N+Sg+Ill: varjo
    vari+N+Sg+Ine: [vaŕon, vaŕoh, vaŕohn]
    vari+N+Sg+Ela: vaŕost
    vari+N+Sg+All: vaŕolõ
    vari+N+Sg+Ade: vaŕol
    vari+N+Sg+Abl: vaŕolt
    vari+N+Sg+Tra: vaŕos
    vari+N+Sg+Ter: vaŕoniq
    vari+N+Sg+Abe: vaŕoldaq
    vari+N+Sg+Com: vaŕogaq
    vari+N+Pl+Nom: vaŕoq
    vari+N+Pl+Gen: [varjõ, varja]
    vari+N+Pl+Par: [varjõ, varja]
    vari+N+Pl+Ill: [varjõhe, varjõ, varjõdõ, varjahe, varja, varjadõ]
    vari+N+Pl+Ine: [vaŕõn, vaŕõh, vaŕõhn, vaŕan, vaŕah, vaŕahn]
    vari+N+Pl+Ela: [vaŕõst, vaŕast]
    vari+N+Pl+All: [vaŕõlõ, vaŕalõ]
    vari+N+Pl+Ade: [vaŕõl, vaŕal]
    vari+N+Pl+Abl: [vaŕõlt, vaŕalt]
    vari+N+Pl+Tra: [vaŕõs, vaŕas]
    vari+N+Pl+Ter: [vaŕõniq, vaŕaniq]
    vari+N+Pl+Abe: [vaŕõldaq, vaŕaldaq]
    vari+N+Pl+Com: [varjõgaq, varjagaq]
